Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20112-4005
Board; appointment of
members; procedure.

Members shall be appointed to the board on a nonpartisan
basis. Candidates for appointment to the board
may place their names on a candidacy list for the respective district or for at-large
appointment by submitting to the board an application for gubernatorial appointment
obtained from the Governor's office, a statement of interest in serving on
the board, two letters of endorsement of the candidate's appointment by grain
sorghum growers, and documentation substantiating qualification to serve as
a member of the board. The board may publish guidelines regarding the forms
of documentation suitable to substantiate qualification to serve on the board.
The board shall perform a review of each candidate's qualification to serve
and shall without undue delay forward all applications for appointment to
the Governor along with the board's assessment of the candidate's qualification
to serve the appointment. Qualified individuals residing within
their district shall be eligible for nomination as candidates from such district, and qualified
individuals residing in the state shall be eligible for at-large appointment.

Laws 1981, LB 11, § 5;

Laws 2011, LB107, § 2.